Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.195

Inspection of premises by secretary.

(1) For the purposes of ascertaining violations of this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW, the secretary or authorized representative has the authority to inspect, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, the premises of any massage or reflexology business establishment during hours such business is open. If the secretary is denied access to any premises or establishment the secretary may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a warrant authorizing access to such premises or establishment for such purposes. The court may, upon such application, issue a warrant for the purpose requested.

(2) This section does not require advance notice of an inspection.

[ 2012 c 137 s 16.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.